Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-202
Members; expenses allowed; when.

Each member of the Legislature shall be allowed necessary expenses incurred while performing in the official capacity as a member of the Legislature.

Laws 1981, LB 206, § 2.

Pursuant to Article III, section 7, of the Constitution of Nebraska and this section, the Legislature was authorized to adopt a policy which would reimburse the members of the Legislature for actual expenses they paid or incurred while performing their duties. Jaksha v. Thomas, 243 Neb. 794, 502 N.W.2d 827 (1993).

Sections 50-201 and 50-202 are not in conflict with Article III, section 7, of the Nebraska Constitution. State ex rel. Douglas v. Beermann, 216 Neb. 849, 347 N.W.2d 297 (1984).